Utah statutes.
3-1-1.   Declaration of policy.
It is the declared policy of this state, as one means of improving the
economic position of agriculture, to encourage the organization of producers
of agricultural products into effective associations under the control of such
producers, and to that end this act shall be liberally construed.
